Nebraska, session 109, LB437.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 71-5848.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-5848.01 A new or modified certificate of need shall be valid for a
period of three years one year from the date of issuance and may be renewed at
the expiration of such period for up to one year if the holder of the
certificate establishes that the holder is meeting the timetable or making a
good faith effort to meet it. The department shall give written notice to an
applicant for a renewal certificate of its decision within thirty days after
receipt of an application. Such decision shall be considered a final decision
of the department for purposes of appeal. If the decision is not appealed, it
shall be final as of the date issued.
Sec. 2. Original section 71-5848.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-1-